District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.13

Notice to persons arrested in connection with a First Amendment assembly of their release options.

(a)

The MPD shall fully and accurately advise persons arrested in connection with a First Amendment assembly of all potential release options when processing them for release from custody or for presentation to court.

(b)

(1)

The MPD shall provide a written notice identifying all release options to each person arrested in connection with a First Amendment assembly who is charged solely with one or more misdemeanor offenses. The notice shall clearly indicate that the options are alternative methods for obtaining a prompt release, and that the availability of each option is dependent on a determination that the arrestee is eligible to participate in that release option. The notice shall also identify the misdemeanor charges lodged against the arrestee.

(2)

The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be offered in the Spanish language to those persons who require or desire notice in this manner, and shall be offered in other languages as is reasonable to ensure meaningful access to the notice for persons who are limited English proficient.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 113, 52 DCR 2296